Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-2603
Security freeze; request.

A consumer may elect to place a security freeze on his or her file by submitting a request at the address or other point of contact and in the manner specified by the consumer reporting agency.

Laws 2007, LB674, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB835, § 3.